Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2649.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:(1) In addition to other notification requirements in this title, a certificated or classified school employee, or a school contractor, who has knowledge of or cause to believe that an assault, theft, or destruction of property has occurred or will occur on school district property, shall cause a report to be made immediately to the proper law enforcement agency and appropriate school administrator.(2) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020, and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW to the same extent it applies to school districts.--- END ---